California statutes. Elections Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Primary Elections:  Other than Recount [16720. - 16720.]

16720.

After the court has heard the proofs and allegations of the parties, it shall file its findings of fact and conclusions of law and immediately pronounce judgment either confirming the nomination or setting it aside and decreeing contestant nominated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Primary Elections:  Involving a Recount [16740. - 16742.]

16740.

When the recount has been completed in the manner required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 16460) of Chapter 5, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 16640) of Chapter 7, all the judges who took part, if more than one, shall assemble and make the decision of the court. If there is any difference of opinion, a majority of the judges shall finally determine all questions, and give a separate decision or judgment in each contest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16741.

A certified copy of the judgment shall be served upon the elections official and may be enforced summarily in the same manner as provided in Section 13314.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 66.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16742.

If the contest proceeds in more than one county, and the nominee is to be certified by the Secretary of State from the compilation of election returns in his or her office, the judgment in each county in which there has been a contest shall show what, if any, changes in the returns in the office of the Secretary of State relating to that county ought to be made. Certified copies of the judgments shall be served upon the Secretary of State. He or she shall make the changes in the record in his or her office as each judgment requires, and conform his or her compilation and his or her certificate of nomination accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Costs [16800. - 16803.]

16800.

If the proceedings in a general election contest under this division are dismissed for insufficiency or for want of prosecution, or the election is confirmed by the court, judgment for costs shall be rendered against the contestant and in favor of the defendant. If the election is annulled or set aside on the ground of errors of a precinct board in conducting the election or in canvassing the returns, the costs shall be a charge against the county or city where the election was held. When the election is annulled or set aside on any other ground, judgment for costs shall be given in favor of contestant and against the defendant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16801.

Where two or more contested elections are joined for the purpose of recounting votes, the costs shall be apportioned among the parties in the discretion of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16802.

Primarily each party is liable for the costs created by himself or herself to the officers and witnesses entitled thereto, which costs may be collected in the same manner as similar costs are collected in other cases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16803.

The provisions relating to costs in contested final elections apply to primary election contests conducted under this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Appeals [16900. - 16940.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Elections [16900. - 16900.]

16900.

Any party aggrieved by the judgment of the court may appeal therefrom to the court of appeal, as in other cases of appeal thereto from the superior court. During the pendency of proceedings on appeal, and until final determination thereof, the person declared elected by the superior court shall be entitled to the office in like manner as if no appeal had been taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Primary Elections:  Other than a Recount [16920. - 16920.]

16920.

Either party to a contest may appeal to the district court of appeal of the district where the contest is brought, if the appeal is perfected by the appellant within 10 days after judgment of the superior court is pronounced. The appeal shall have precedence over all other appeals and shall be acted upon by the district court of appeal within 10 days after the appeal is filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Primary Elections:  Involving a Recount [16940. - 16940.]

16940.

The judgment of the court is final in every respect. No party may appeal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. RETENTION AND PRESERVATION OF ELECTION RECORDS [17000. - 17603.]



CHAPTER 1. Affidavits of Registration and Voter Registration Indexes [17000. - 17001.]

17000.

(a) The elections official shall preserve all canceled original affidavits of registration for a period of five years, after which they may be destroyed by that officer.

(b) In lieu of preserving the canceled original affidavit of registration, the elections official may, by filming or other suitable method, record the canceled affidavit and destroy the affidavit following the first general election after the date of cancellation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

The elections official shall keep a copy of the roster described in Section 2183 on file as a public record for election, political research, and governmental purposes for a period of five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 78.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Nomination Documents [17100. - 17100.]

17100.

(a) All nomination documents and signatures in lieu of filing fee petitions filed in accordance with this code shall be held by the officer with whom they are filed during the term of office for which they are filed and for four years after the expiration of the term.

(b) Thereafter, the documents and petitions shall be destroyed as soon as practicable unless they either are in evidence in some action or proceeding then pending or unless the elections official has received a written request from the Attorney General, the Secretary of State, the Fair Political Practices Commission, a district attorney, a grand jury, or the governing body of a county, city and county, or district, including a school district, that the documents and petitions be preserved for use in a pending or ongoing investigation into election irregularities, the subject of which relates to the placement of a candidate’s name on the ballot, or in a pending or ongoing investigation into a violation of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(c) Public access to the documents described in subdivision (a) shall be limited to viewing the documents only. The public may not copy or distribute copies of the documents described in subdivision (a) that contain signatures of voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Initiative and Referendum Petitions [17200. - 17200.]

17200.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), elections officials required by law to receive or file in their offices any initiative or referendum petition shall preserve the petition until eight months after the certification of the results of the election for which the petition qualified or, if the measure, for any reason, is not submitted to the voters, eight months after the final examination of the petition by the elections official.

(b) Thereafter, the petition shall be destroyed as soon as practicable unless any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The petition is in evidence in some action or proceeding then
 pending.

(2) The elections official has received a written request from the Attorney General, the Secretary of State, the Fair Political Practices Commission, a district attorney, a grand jury, or the governing body of a county, city and county, or district, including a school district, that the petition be preserved for use in a pending or ongoing investigation into election irregularities, the subject of which relates to the petition’s qualification or disqualification for placement on the ballot, or in a pending or ongoing investigation into a violation of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(3) The proponents of the petition have commenced an examination pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of
 Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, in which case the petition shall be preserved until one year from the date that the proponents last examined the
 petition.

(c) If a petition subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) is circulated in multiple counties, a county that performs an examination pursuant to this section shall inform the other counties in which the petition is circulated of the examination to facilitate compliance with that paragraph. If the petition is circulated statewide, the Secretary of State shall ensure compliance.

(d) Public access to the petition shall be restricted in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(e) This section applies to the following petitions:

(1) Statewide initiative and referendum petitions.

(2) County initiative and referendum petitions.

(3) Municipal initiative and referendum petitions.

(4) Municipal city charter amendment petitions.

(5) District initiative and referendum petitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 100.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Precinct Supplies and Ballots [17300. - 17306.]

17300.

(a) (1) The elections official shall preserve all rosters or combined rosters and voter lists as provided for in Section 14107, if applicable, until five years after the date of the election, after which they may be destroyed by that official.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, if an electronic poll book is used, a copy of the electronic data file may be preserved in lieu of preserving a paper copy of the rosters or combined rosters and voter lists, if applicable.

(b) In lieu of preserving the original roster, the elections official may, by filming or other suitable method, record the original roster of voters and destroy the roster following the next subsequent general
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 100, Sec. 4.   (AB 1591)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to those elections where candidates for one or more of the following offices are voted upon: President, Vice President, United States Senator, and United States Representative.

(b) The packages containing the following items shall be kept by the elections official, unopened and unaltered, for 22 months from the date of the election:

(1) Voted polling place ballots.

(2) Paper cast vote records, as defined by Sections 305.5 and 19271.

(3) Voted vote by mail voter ballots.

(4) Vote by mail voter identification envelopes.

(5) Voted provisional voter ballots.

(6) Voted conditional voter registration ballots.

(7) Provisional ballot voter identification envelopes, including conditional voter registration voter identification envelopes cast pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2170.

(8) Spoiled ballots.

(9) Canceled ballots.

(10) Unused vote by mail ballots surrendered by the voter pursuant to Section 3015.

(c) If a contest is not commenced within the 22-month period, or if a criminal prosecution involving fraudulent use, marking or falsification of ballots, or forgery of vote by mail voters’ signatures is not commenced within the 22-month period, either of which may involve the vote of the precinct from which voted ballots were received, the elections official shall have the items identified in subdivision (b) destroyed or recycled. The packages shall otherwise remain unopened until the items
 are destroyed or recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 6.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to all state or local elections not provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 17301. An election is not deemed a state or local election if votes for candidates for federal office may be cast on the same ballot as votes for candidates for state or local office.

(b) The packages containing the following items shall be kept by the elections official, unopened and unaltered, for six months from the date of the election:

(1) Voted polling place ballots.

(2) Paper cast vote records, as defined by Sections 305.5 and 19271.

(3) Voted vote by mail voter ballots.

(4) Vote by mail voter identification envelopes.

(5) Voted provisional voter ballots.

(6) Voted conditional
 voter registration ballots.

(7) Provisional ballot voter identification envelopes, including conditional voter registration voter identification envelopes cast pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2170.

(8) Spoiled ballots.

(9) Canceled ballots.

(10) Unused vote by mail ballots surrendered by the voter pursuant to Section 3015.

(c) If a contest is not commenced within the six-month period, or if a criminal prosecution involving fraudulent use, marking or falsification of ballots, or forgery of vote by mail voters’ signatures is not commenced within the six-month period, either of which may involve the vote of the precinct from which voted ballots were received, the elections official shall have the items identified in subdivision (b) destroyed or recycled. The packages shall otherwise remain unopened until the items are
 destroyed or recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 7.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17303.

(a) The following provisions apply to those elections in which candidates for one or more of the following offices are voted upon: President, Vice President, United States Senator, and United States Representative.

(b) The elections official shall preserve the package or packages containing the following items for a period of 22 months:

(1) Two tally sheets.

(2) The challenge lists.

(3) The assisted voters’ list.

(c) All voters may inspect the contents of the package or packages at all times following
 commencement of the official canvass of the votes.

(d) If a contest is not commenced within the 22-month period, or if a criminal prosecution involving fraudulent use, marking, or falsification of ballots, or forgery of vote by mail voters’ signatures is not commenced within the 22-month period, either of which may involve the vote of the precinct from which voted ballots were received, the elections official may have the packages destroyed or recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 100, Sec. 5.   (AB 1591)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17304.

(a) The following provisions apply to all state or local elections not provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 17303. An election is not deemed a state or local election if votes for candidates for federal office may be cast on the same ballot as votes for candidates for state or local office.

(b) The elections official shall preserve the package or packages containing the following items for a period of six months:

(1) Two tally sheets.

(2) The copy of the roster used as the voting record. If an electronic poll book is used,
 a copy of the electronic data file may be preserved in lieu of creating a paper copy.

(3) The challenge lists.

(4) The assisted voters’ list.

(c) All voters may inspect the contents of the package or packages at all times following commencement of the official canvass of the votes, except that items that contain signatures of voters may not be copied or distributed.

(d) If a contest is not commenced within the six-month period, or if a criminal prosecution involving fraudulent use, marking or falsification of ballots, or forgery of vote by mail voters’ signatures is not commenced within the six-month period, either of which may involve the vote of the
 precinct from which voted ballots were received, the elections official may have the packages destroyed or recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 81.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17305.

(a) The following provisions apply to those elections where candidates for one or more of the following offices are voted upon: President, Vice President, United States Senator, and United States Representative.

(b) Upon the completion of the counting of the votes as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 15640) of Chapter 9 of Division 15, all items specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17301 shall be kept by the elections official for 22 months from the date of the election
 or so long thereafter as any contest involving the vote at the election remains undetermined.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the final disposition of all items specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17301 shall be determined by the elections official.

(d) Sealed ballot containers shall not be opened
 unless the elections official determines it is necessary in a shredding or recycling process. This section shall not be construed to allow packages or containers to be opened except for purposes specified herein. The packages or containers shall otherwise remain unopened until the ballots and paper cast vote records are destroyed or recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 8.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17306.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to all state or local elections not provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 17305. An election is not deemed a state or local election if votes for candidates for federal office may be cast on the same ballot as votes for candidates for state or local office.

(b) Upon the completion of the counting of the votes as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 15640) of Chapter 9 of Division 15, all items specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17302
 shall be kept by the elections official for six months from the date of the election or so long thereafter as any contest involving the vote at the election remains undetermined.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the final disposition of all items specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17302 shall be determined by the elections official.

(d) Sealed ballot containers shall not
 be opened unless the elections official determines it is necessary in a shredding or recycling process. This section shall not be construed to allow packages or containers to be opened except for purposes specified herein. The packages or containers shall otherwise remain unopened until the ballots and paper cast vote records are destroyed or recycled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 9.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Recall Petitions [17400. - 17400.]

17400.

(a) The elections official shall preserve in that person’s office all recall petitions filed for eight months after the results of the election for which the petition qualified or, if no election is held, eight months after the elections official’s final examination of the petition.

(b) Thereafter, the petition shall be destroyed as soon as practicable, unless it is in evidence in some action or proceeding then pending or unless the elections official has received a written request from the Attorney General, the Secretary of State, the Fair Political Practices Commission, a district attorney, a grand jury, or
 the governing body of a county, city and county, city, or district, including a school district, that the petition be preserved for use in a pending or ongoing investigation into election irregularities, or in a pending or ongoing investigation into a violation of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(c) Public access to the petition shall be restricted in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 101) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 166, Sec. 5.   (AB 2967)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [17501. - 17506.]

17501.

Following each general election, the county elections official shall file copies of all precinct maps with the Secretary of State. If there is no change in the precinct maps from those maps that are currently on file, in lieu of filing copies of those maps with the Secretary of State, the elections official may submit a written statement informing the Secretary of State of that fact. The Secretary of State shall maintain a file of all the copies for 12 years and shall, upon request, make them available for examination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

17502.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to those elections where candidates for one or more of the following offices are voted upon: President, Vice President, United States Senator, and United States Representative.

(b) The elections official shall preserve the following records reflecting the appointment of precinct officials until 22 months from the date of any election.

(1) Precinct officers’ declaration of intention required by Section 12321.

(2) Precinct board member applications specified in Section 12300.

(3) Order appointing members of the several precinct boards and designating the polling places specified in Section 12286.

(4) Nominations for appointment to the precinct board by the county central committee of each qualified political party specified in Section 12306.

(5) Written orders appointing precinct board members or designating the polling place for the precinct pursuant to Section 12327.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 810, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17503.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to all state or local elections not provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 17502. An election is not deemed a state or local election if votes for candidates for federal office may be cast on the same ballot as votes for candidates for state or local office.

(b) The elections official shall preserve the following records reflecting the appointment of precinct officials until six months from the date of an election.

(1) Precinct officers’ declaration of intention required by Section 12321.

(2) Precinct board member applications specified in Section 12300.

(3) Order appointing members of the several precinct boards and designating the polling places specified in Section 12286.

(4) Nominations for appointment to the precinct board by the county central committee of each qualified political party specified in Section 12306.

(5) Written orders appointing precinct board members or designating the polling place for the precinct pursuant to Section 12327.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 810, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17506.

(a) The elections official shall preserve the list of new resident voters voting pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3400) of Division 3 for 22 months from the date of the election.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 109, Sec. 11.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Preservation of Electronic Data [17600. - 17603.]

17600.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Ballot image” means an electronically captured or generated image of a ballot that is created on a voting device or machine, which contains a list of contests on the ballot, may contain the voter selections for those contests, and complies with the ballot layout requirements.

(b) “Certified voting technology” means any certified voting technologies certified by the Secretary of State, including voting systems,
 ballot on demand printing systems, electronic poll book systems, or adjudication systems, and the hardware, firmware, software, proprietary intellectual property they contain, any components, and any products they generate, including ballots, ballot images, reports, logs, cast vote records, or electronic data.

(c) “Chain of custody” means a process used to track the movement and control of certified voting technology, as defined in subdivision (b), through its lifecycle by documenting each person and organization who handles certified voting technology, the date and time it was collected or transferred, and the purpose of the transfer. A break in the chain of custody refers to a period during which control of the certified voting technology is uncertain and during which actions taken on the certified voting technology are unaccounted for
 or unconfirmed.

(d) “Electronic data” includes voting technology software, operating systems, databases, firmware, drivers, and logs.

(e) “End of lifecycle” means the secure clearing or wiping of the certified voting technology so that no software, firmware, or data remains on the equipment and the equipment becomes a nonfunctioning piece of hardware.

(f) “HASH” means a mathematical algorithm used to create a digital fingerprint of a software program, which is used to validate software as identical to the original.

(g) “Lifecycle” of certified voting technology means the entire lifecycle of the certified voting technology from the time of certification and trusted
 build creation through the end of lifecycle of the certified voting technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 10.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to those elections where candidates for one or more of the following offices are voted upon: President, Vice President, United States Senator, and United States Representative.

(b) (1) The following data shall be kept by the elections official, on electronic media, including, but not limited to, a hard drive, solid-state drive, flash drive, memory card, or other digital storage device, stored and unaltered, for 22 months from the date of the election:

(A) All voting system electronic data.

(B) All ballot on demand system electronic data, if applicable.

(C) All adjudication electronic data.

(D) All remote accessible vote by mail system electronic data, if applicable.

(E) All electronic poll book electronic data, if applicable.

(F) HASH values taken from
 the voting technology devices, if applicable.

(G) All ballot images.

(2) The electronic media which holds the data described in subparagraphs (A) through (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be stored in a sealed container.

(c) If a contest is not commenced within the 22-month period, or if a criminal prosecution involving fraudulent use, using the ballot tally system to mark or falsify ballots, or manipulation of the ballot
 tally system, is not commenced within the 22-month period, either of which may involve the vote count of the precinct from which voted ballots were received, the elections official shall have the backups destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   (SB 1418)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17602.

(a) The following provisions shall apply to all state or local elections not provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 17601. An election is not deemed a state or local election if votes for candidates for federal office may be cast on the same ballot as votes for candidates for state or local office.

(b) (1) The following data shall be kept by the elections official, on electronic media, including, but not limited to, a hard drive, solid-state drive, flash drive, memory card, or other digital storage device, stored and
 unaltered, for six months from the date of the election:

(A) All voting system electronic data.

(B) All ballot on demand system electronic data, if applicable.

(C) All adjudication electronic data.

(D) All remote accessible vote by mail system electronic data, if applicable.

(E) All electronic poll book electronic data, if
 applicable.

(F) HASH values taken from the voting technology devices, if applicable.

(G) All ballot images, if applicable.

(2) The electronic media which holds the data described in
 subparagraphs (A) through (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be stored in a sealed container.

(c) If a contest is not commenced within the six-month period, or if a criminal prosecution involving fraudulent use, using the ballot tally system to mark or falsify ballots, or manipulation of the ballot tally system is not commenced within the six-month period, either of which may involve the vote count of the precinct from which voted ballots were received, the elections official shall have the backups destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   (SB 1418)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17603.

(a) Certified voting technology equipment and components that are at the end of lifecycle may be securely disposed of or destroyed with the written approval of the manufacturer and the Secretary of State.

(b) With respect to any part or component of certified voting technology for which the chain of custody has been compromised or the security or information has been breached or attempted to be breached, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The chief elections official of the city, county, or special district and the Secretary of State shall be notified within 24 hours of discovery.

(2) The equipment shall be removed from service immediately and replaced if possible.

(3) The integrity and reliability of the certified voting technology system, components, and accompanying electronic data shall be evaluated to determine whether they can be restored to their original state and reinstated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 10.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 18. PENAL PROVISIONS [18000. - 18700.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [18000. - 18002.]

18000.

This division applies to all elections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18001.

Upon a conviction for any crime punishable by imprisonment in any jail or prison, in relation to which no fine is herein prescribed, the court may impose a fine on the offender not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in cases of misdemeanors or up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in cases of felonies, in addition to the imprisonment prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, Sec. 4.   (AB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

(a) Every person charged with the performance of any duty under any law of this state relating to elections, who willfully neglects or refuses to perform it, or who, in the person’s official capacity, knowingly and fraudulently acts in contravention or violation of any of those laws, is, unless a different punishment is prescribed by this code, punishable by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section does not apply to Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 6900) and 1.2 (commencing with Section 6911) of Part 2 of
 Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 15.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Voter Registration [18100. - 18112.]

18100.

(a) Every person who willfully causes, procures, or allows himself or herself or any other person to be registered as a voter, knowing that he or she or that other person is not entitled to registration, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail for not more than one year.

(b) Every person who knowingly and willfully signs, or causes or procures the signing of, an affidavit of registration of a nonexistent person, and who mails or delivers, or causes or procures the mailing or delivery of, that affidavit to a county elections official is guilty of a crime punishable by
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail for not more than one year. For purposes of this subdivision, “nonexistent person” includes, but is not limited to, deceased persons, animals, and inanimate objects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 58.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.

Every person who knowingly and willfully completes, or causes or procures the completion of, in whole or in part, an affidavit of registration or a voter registration card, with the intent to cause the registration or reregistration as a voter of a fictitious person or of any person who has not requested registration or reregistration as a voter, is guilty of a crime punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 59.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18102.

Any deputy elections official or registration elections official who knowingly registers a nonexistent person, knowingly registers a person under a false name or address, or knowingly registers a person who is ineligible to register is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 60.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18103.

Any person who knowingly or negligently (a) interferes with the prompt transfer of a completed affidavit of registration to the county elections official, (b) retains a voter’s completed registration card, without the voter’s authorization, for more than three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays, or after the close of registration, or (c) denies a voter the right to return to the county elections official the voter’s own completed registration card, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18104.

An individual or organization having charge of affidavits of registration is guilty of a misdemeanor who knowingly neglects or refuses to return affidavits of registration as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 2138) of Chapter 2 of Division 2. The county elections official shall report to the district attorney of the county, under oath, the names of all individuals or organizations who have failed to return the affidavits. The district attorney shall take appropriate civil or criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 106, Sec. 5.   (AB 3370)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18105.

No affidavit of registration or voter registration card shall contain, and no person other than the registrant shall write on or affix thereto, or cause to be written on or affixed thereto, any statement urging or indicating support or opposition to any candidate or measure.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18106.

Every person is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail for not more than one year who, without the specific consent of the affiant, willfully and with the intent to affect the affiant’s voting rights, causes, procures, or allows the completion, alteration, or defacement of the affiant’s party affiliation declaration contained in an executed, or partially executed, affidavit of registration pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 2150 and Section 2151.

This section shall not apply to a county elections official carrying out his or her official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 47.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18107.

Every person who willfully violates Section 2158 is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18107.5.

(a) (1) A person who knowingly or willfully pays or offers to pay money or other valuable consideration to another person with the intent to induce the person to vote or to register to vote, or where the payment is contingent upon whether the person voted or the person’s voter registration status, is guilty of a crime.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “other valuable consideration” includes, but is not limited to, a chance to win a lottery or similar prize-drawing contest.

(3) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(A) Transportation to or from a voting location.

(B) Compensation provided to an individual by a governmental entity.

(C) Granting time off to an employee to vote.
